nursery/apertium-eng-afr/apertium-eng-afr.afr.dix
    <pardef n="perso/on__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
	  <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
	  <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="antige/en__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
	  <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
	  <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="polisie__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="polisieman__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sko/ol__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ol</l>
	  <r>ol<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
	  <r>ol<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kind__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ers</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="plane/et__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
	  <r>et<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
	  <r>et<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ka/as__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
	  <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>se</l>
	  <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="appelko/os__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
	  <r>os<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>se</l>
	  <r>os<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ho/f__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
	  <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>we</l>
	  <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aanko/op__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>op</l>
	  <r>op<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pe</l>
	  <r>op<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ty/d__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
	  <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
	  <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="a/ap__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ap</l>
	  <r>ap<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pe</l>
	  <r>ap<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gra/af__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>af</l>
	  <r>af<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>we</l>
	  <r>af<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kre/ef__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ef</l>
	  <r>ef<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>we</l>
	  <r>ef<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="s/og__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>og</l>
	  <r>og<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ôe</l>
	  <r>og<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="br/ug__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ug</l>
	  <r>ug<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ûe</l>
	  <r>ug<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="boodskap__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pe</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Afrikaans__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
  </pardef>

    <pardef n="sk/ip__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ip</l>
	  <r>ip<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>epe</l>
	  <r>ip<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="e/ed__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
	  <r>ed<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
	  <r>ed<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gelo/of__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>of</l>
	  <r>of<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owe</l>
	  <r>of<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bro/od__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>od</l>
	  <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
	  <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Kanade/es__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
	  <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>se</l>
	  <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="rob__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>be</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="swe/ep__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ep</l>
	  <r>ep<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pe</l>
	  <r>ep<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hem/p__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>p</l>
	  <r>p<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>p</l>
	  <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="goed__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ere</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="spo/ok__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ok</l>
	  <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
	  <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hoed__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lam__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mers</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aanb/od__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>od</l>
	  <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iedinge</l>
	  <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Acronyms -->
    <pardef n="DNA__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Abbreviations -->
    <pardef n="Mnr__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Proper Nouns -->

    <pardef n="Wynand__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="Anrie__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="vlug"><i>vlug</i><par n="ty/d__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skoolkind"><i>skoolkind</i><par n="kind__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brug"><i>br</i><par n="br/ug__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oorbrug"><i>oorbr</i><par n="br/ug__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trog"><i>tr</i><par n="s/og__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sog"><i>s</i><par n="s/og__n"/></e>
    <e lm="RFC"><i>RFC</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nm"><i>nm</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mnr"><i>mnr</i><par n="Mnr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="komm"><i>komm</i><par n="Mnr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klere"><i>klere</i><par n="polisie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="personeel"><i>personeel</i><par n="polisie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Anne"><i>Anne</i><par n="Anrie__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Elizabeth"><i>Elizabeth</i><par n="Anrie__np"/></e>
    <e lm="James"><i>James</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Paul"><i>Paul</i><par n="Wynand__np"/></e>
    <e lm="luitoon"><i>luito</i><par n="perso/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="saxofoon"><i>saxofo</i><par n="perso/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="noordpool"><i>noordpo</i><par n="sko/ol__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pistool"><i>pisto</i><par n="sko/ol__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aankoop"><i>aanko</i><par n="aanko/op__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skaap"><i>ska</i><par n="a/ap__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baas"><i>ba</i><par n="ka/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baksteen"><i>bakste</i><par n="antige/en__n"/></e>
    <e lm="been"><i>be</i><par n="antige/en__n"/></e>
    <e lm="geograaf"><i>geogra</i><par n="gra/af__n"/></e>
    <e lm="haas"><i>ha</i><par n="ka/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="volkere"><i>volkere</i><par n="Afrikaans__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skip"><i>sk</i><par n="sk/ip__n"/></e>
    <e lm="troon"><i>tro</i><par n="perso/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eed"><i>e</i><par n="e/ed__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ledige tyd"><i>ledige<b/>ty</i><par n="ty/d__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bygeloof"><i>bygelo</i><par n="gelo/of__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ortopeed"><i>ortope</i><par n="e/ed__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brood"><i>bro</i><par n="bro/od__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Kanadees"><i>Kanade</i><par n="Kanade/es__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dobbelsteen"><i>dobbelste</i><par n="antige/en__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Nederlands"><i>Nederlands</i><par n="Afrikaans__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kaap"><i>ka</i><par n="a/ap__n"/></e>
    <e lm="landgoed"><i>landgoed</i><par n="goed__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plaas"><i>pla</i><par n="ka/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vrees"><i>vre</i><par n="Kanade/es__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Franse"><i>Franse</i><par n="polisie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spook"><i>spo</i><par n="spo/ok__n"/></e>
    <e lm="goed"><i>goed</i><par n="goed__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kleinkind"><i>kleinkind</i><par n="kind__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hoop"><i>hoop</i><par n="aanko/op__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lam"><i>lam</i><par n="lam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maaltyd"><i>maalty</i><par n="ty/d__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aanbod"><i>aanb</i><par n="aanb/od__n"/></e>
    <e lm="framboos"><i>frambo</i><par n="appelko/os__n"/></e>
    <e lm="roos"><i>ro</i><par n="appelko/os__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rob"><i>rob</i><par n="rob__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gevoel"><i>gevoel</i><par n="hoed__n"/></e>
    <e lm="simbool"><i>simbo</i><par n="sko/ol__n"/></e>
    <e lm="greep"><i>gre</i><par n="swe/ep__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gigagreep"><i>gigagre</i><par n="swe/ep__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spoed"><i>spoed</i><par n="hoed__n"/></e>
    <e lm="roman"><i>roman</i><par n="polisieman__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gesplete hoef"><i>gesplete<b/>ho</i><par n="kre/ef__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vuurproef"><i>vuurpro</i><par n="kre/ef__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aangenome kind"><i>aangenome kind</i><par n="kind__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dekreet"><i>dekre</i><par n="plane/et__n"/></e>
    <e lm="juigkreet"><i>juigkre</i><par n="plane/et__n"/></e>
    <e lm="weerprofeet"><i>weerprofe</i><par n="plane/et__n"/></e>
    <e lm="noodplan"><i>noodplan</i><par n="polisieman__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kolonelskap"><i>kolonelskap</i><par n="boodskap__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hof"><i>ho</i><par n="ho/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="voorhof"><i>voorho</i><par n="ho/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ontwikkelingsgemeenskap"><i>ontwikkelingsgemeenskap</i><par n="boodskap__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hulpbron"><i>hulpbron</i><par n="polisieman__n"/></e>
